Utah statutes.
26-8a-403.   Establishment of maximum rates.
(1)  The department shall, after receiving recommendations under Subsection
(2), establish maximum rates for ground ambulance providers and paramedic
providers that are just and reasonable.
(2)  The committee may make recommendations to the department on the maximum
rates that should be set under Subsection (1).
(3) (a)  The department shall prohibit ground ambulance providers and
paramedic providers from charging fees for transporting a patient when the
provider does not transport the patient.
(b)  The provisions of Subsection (3)(a) do not apply to ambulance providers
or paramedic providers in a geographic service area which contains a town as
defined in Subsection 10-2-301(2)(f).
